Maine, session 132, LD438.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §652, as amended by PL 2023, c. 360, Pt. A, §6, is further
amended by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, if the governing body of
a municipality by vote determines that granting an exemption under this section would be
detrimental to the residents of that municipality, the governing body may limit the amount
of the exemption granted to an organization or institution pursuant to this section.